California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

8535.

(a) When governing boards agree to transfer an existing program all legal and contractual obligations of either or both districts under the program shall be clearly stated, with appropriate time requirements, in the written transfer agreement approved by the affected governing boards.

(b) The written transfer agreement approved pursuant to subdivision (a) shall specify the number of units of average daily attendance and the revenue per unit of average daily attendance proposed to be transferred from the district with the existing program. A true copy of the transfer agreement shall be forwarded to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or both, as appropriate, no later than three months prior to the effective date of the program transfer.

(c) When part or all of an existing program of a high school or unified school district is to be transferred to a community college district by mutual agreement of the affected governing boards, the transfer agreement shall specify that only courses that qualify as community college noncredit education under Section 84711 shall be transferred. A true copy of the complete transfer agreement shall be forwarded by the community college district to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges as specified in subdivision (b).

When part or all of an existing program of a community college district is transferred to a high school or unified school district by mutual agreement of the affected governing boards, the transfer agreement shall specify that only those adult education courses that are described under Section 41976 shall be transferred. A true copy of the complete transfer agreement shall be forwarded by the high school or unified school district to the Superintendent of Public Instruction as specified in subdivision (b).

(d) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall jointly verify and approve the courses, the units of average daily attendance, and the revenue per unit of average daily attendance, including applicable inflation adjustment, if any, to be transferred under this section. Additional units of average daily attendance reported by the community college district, or the high school or unified school district, as a result of the transfer shall not be subject to any statutory limitations on fundable increases in average daily attendance, but shall be subject in subsequent years to statutory calculations of noncredit base revenue and units of average daily attendance of the community college district, or the adult base revenue and units of average daily attendance of the high school or unified school district, as applicable.

(e) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall jointly determine the amount of apportionment to be transferred or reappropriated, pursuant to subdivision (d), from the affected Budget Act appropriation of the State School Fund by multiplying the units of average daily attendance to be transferred by the revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance of the transferring district at the time of the transfer. The chancellor and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit appropriate budget documents to the Department of Finance for approval of the transfer of funds from the applicable appropriation. The Director of Finance shall approve that transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1123, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8536.

The governing board of every district affected by this chapter shall make all reasonable efforts to reach a mutual agreement when such an agreement is required and shall develop procedures for this purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8537.

If a mutual agreement cannot be reached by the district governing boards, the points of disagreement shall be resolved by the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8538.

Effective July 1, 1977, (a) for noncredit classes or programs offered in community colleges pursuant to this chapter, average daily attendance for state apportionment purposes shall only be calculated for such classes or programs which by mutual agreement are the responsibility of the community colleges pursuant to Sections 8530 and 8531; and (b) for noncredit classes or programs offered in the community colleges and for classes for adults offered in high schools or adult schools pursuant to this chapter, average daily attendance for state apportionment purposes shall only be calculated for such classes or programs which by mutual agreement are the responsibility of the community colleges or of the high school or unified school districts pursuant to Sections 8532 and 8533.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. California Summer Science and Technology Academy [8630. - 8633.]

8630.

It is the intent of the Legislature, pursuant to this chapter, to do all of the following:

(a) Support the educational experiences of all pupils, and to assist them to excel, in the fields of mathematics, science, and technology, especially with regard to females and minority members, who have traditionally been underrepresented in those fields.

(b) Encourage and improve upon the performance of California pupils in national competitions in mathematics, science, and technology.

(c) Provide opportunities for capable pupils to participate in summer honors research programs with research faculty at the University of California and other institutions of higher education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1443, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8631.

The California Summer Science and Technology Academy is hereby established. The academy shall be a statewide program that shall be developed and operated to identify public high school pupils with high academic potential in mathematics, science, and technology, with an emphasis on females and minority members, to participate in university-based research programs. Special consideration shall be given to recruiting pupils who are participants in the Mathematics, Engineering, and Science Achievement program described in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 8600). The pupils, in cooperation with teachers from sponsoring high schools, shall work directly with university research faculty to undertake and complete research purposes that are educationally significant and scientifically manageable. The objective of the research, for the purposes of this chapter, is to enhance the instruction in mathematics, science, and technology that is otherwise provided to the participating pupils in high school, to better prepare those pupils for coursework in those subject areas at the university level, and to provide research data to enhance the participation of those pupils in statewide, national, and international competitions in those subject areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1443, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8633.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1443, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.8. California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science [8660. - 8669.1.]

8660.

(a) The California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science is hereby created to establish a multidisciplinary academic development program in mathematics and science and to enable pupils with demonstrated academic excellence in mathematics and science to receive intensive educational enrichment in these subjects.

(b) The California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science shall provide an opportunity for pupils who wish to study advanced mathematics or science or to
 pursue careers that require a high degree of skills and knowledge in mathematics or science.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 5.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8661.

The Regents of the University of California are hereby requested to operate the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 6.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8662.

(a) Pupils who have demonstrated academic excellence in mathematics and science and who meet one of the following criteria shall be eligible for admission to the summer school:

(1) The pupil graduated, or will graduate, from the 8th grade at a California school at the end of the school year immediately preceding the summer school session for which the pupil is applying.

(2) The pupil is currently enrolled at a California school in
 any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(3) The pupil graduated from a California high school during the school year immediately preceding the summer school session for which the pupil is applying.

(b) A pupil’s participation in the summer school shall not be credited toward the pupil’s completion of the course of study prescribed for graduation from high school, unless the local school district that the pupil regularly attends tenders payment to the pupil, no later than the last day of the summer school session, for all application and other fees and expenses charged to the pupil by the summer school that would not be charged to a pupil enrolled in the public school system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (SB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to perform all of the following duties:

(a) Provide for the operation and governance of the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science, including the appointment of an advisory committee to assist in planning and administering the summer school.

(b) Develop and implement a statewide application procedure in cooperation with appropriate state and local agencies, including, but not limited to, school districts, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges. The cost of the application process shall be at least partially offset by charging each applicant
 a fee set at forty dollars ($40) in 2023, and this fee may be increased by an amount up to 5 percent each year thereafter. Applicants who are unable to pay the fee shall petition the University of California for a waiver, which shall be granted or denied pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8669.

(c) Develop the curriculum of the summer school.

(d) Establish a nonprofit foundation to develop and receive private support for the summer school or establish a separate account for donations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   (SB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8666.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the period of instruction for the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science commence no earlier than one week following the end of the regular school year, and concludes no later than one week prior to the commencement of the next regular school year. This section shall not be construed to prohibit two sessions per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 11.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8667.

(a) The University of California shall be responsible for selection of the faculty of the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science.

(b) The faculty for the summer school shall be selected from distinguished kindergarten to 12th grade, inclusive, teachers and university faculty of mathematics and science, and may not be restricted to members of the current faculty of the University of California. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the faculty may not be
 subject to credentialing requirements or any other restrictions upon eligibility for employment generally applicable to public school instructors, except for the requirement of obtaining a certificate of clearance from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Sections 44332.5, 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 12.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8668.

The site for the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science shall be chosen by the Regents of the University of California. The Regents of the University of California are requested to collaborate with other institutions of higher education regarding the planning and administration of the summer school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 13.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8669.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that at least 50 percent, but not more than 75 percent, of the actual costs of the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science for each fiscal year would be financed by state funds beginning in the 1999–2000 fiscal year. The balance of the operating costs would be financed with fees and private support.

(b) The Regents of the University of California are requested to set a tuition fee within a range that corresponds to actual program costs, up to but not exceeding four thousand seven hundred seventy dollars ($4,770) per session in 2023, and the regents may increase this fee by an amount up to 5 percent each year thereafter. It
 is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California award full or partial scholarships on the basis of need and that pupils who are unable to pay all or part of the fee may petition the University of California for a fee reduction or waiver to ensure that a qualified applicant is not denied admission solely because of the applicant’s inability to pay all or part of the fee. A public announcement regarding the summer school program should include notification that need-based scholarships are available and information regarding the procedure for applying for a scholarship award.

(c) The foundation authorized to be established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8664 may raise funds from the private sector that the summer school may use for general program operating costs, scholarships, program augmentation, public relations,
 recruitment activity, or special projects. Private support may include, but is not necessarily limited to, direct grants to the summer school from private corporations or foundations, individual contributions, in-kind contributions, or fundraising benefits conducted by any entity.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 334, Sec. 4.   (SB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8669.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California conduct an evaluation on the effectiveness of the California State Summer School for Mathematics and Science every two years from July 7, 1999. The evaluation shall include a description of the planning conducted and actions taken to increase the participation of subgroups of pupils who are traditionally underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) professional fields, including pupils who are low-income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 334, Sec. 5.   (SB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Environmental Education [8700. - 8774.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policy [8700. - 8707.]

8700.

The Legislature finds and declares that, throughout the state and nation, there is a growing public awareness of the benefits derived from a healthy environment and a healthy economy, and that the citizens of the State of California expect the educational institutions of this state to provide students with educational materials that are balanced and objective in their coverage of the current scientific and economic research on environmental and ecological issues to enable students to better address and assess environmental issues as we enter the 21st century.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.

The Legislature further finds and declares that an informed public working for the common environmental good through its democratic institutions at all educational and professional levels and among all interested private parties can break the chain of destructive land use, restore land which has been improperly abused, and build balance and beauty into our cities of the future.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

The Legislature further finds and declares that an educational program is needed that is designed to build necessary attitudes of stewardship toward the maintenance of the quality of our common environment and to enable all citizens to use wisely, and not destructively, the resources at their disposal. These attitudes are best developed at an early age through programs that encourage personal responsibility and participation in the local community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

The Legislature further finds and declares that without appropriate long-term funding, and without effective programs to encourage efforts and innovations at the school district level, and without needed materials and meaningful outdoor study opportunities, conservation education will remain a stepchild in the crowded family of public education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

The Legislature further finds and declares that man has a moral obligation to understand the world in which he lives and to protect, enhance, and make the highest use of the land and resources he holds in trust for future generations, and that the dignity and worth of the individual requires a quality environment in which he can develop the full potentials of his spirit and intellect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

The Legislature further finds and declares that conservation education should be a means of achieving an educational philosophy that will help each student develop a healthy attitude of personal responsibility toward his environment and its resources and provide him with the concepts, the knowledge, and the skills needed to contribute meaningfully to the decisionmaking process on issues involving the environment and its resources.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in all grade levels, environmental facts should be taught as they relate to each other, rather than as isolated bits of information, and that students should become aware of the interrelated nature of living processes, gain understanding of ecological relationships and of the effect of human activities upon these relationships, and become sensitive to the interdependence of man and natural resources.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage development of educational programs for teachers and students commensurate with the importance of protecting scarce resources and safeguarding the quality of our environment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conservation Education Service [8720. - 8723.]

8720.

There is in the Department of Education the Conservation Education Service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8721.

The Conservation Education Service shall encourage the development of educational opportunities specifically related to the conservation, the interpretation, and the use of the natural resources of the State of California, including, but not limited to, the development of nature centers, the development of conservation and wildlife education camps, and the development of the educational curriculum in relation to the conservation of natural resources and factors affecting environmental quality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8722.

The Conservation Education Service shall have the following additional powers and duties:

(1) To assist school districts, community college districts, and county superintendents of schools in preparing teachers to present concepts of conservation, the effects of pollution and major land alterations on ecological systems, and the factors affecting the quality of the environment.

(2) To cooperate with and assist community colleges, state colleges, and the University of California in the development of preservice programs designed to prepare teachers to present concepts and facts relating to conservation, the effects of pollution and major land alterations on ecological systems, and factors affecting the quality of the environment.

(3) To assist school districts, community college districts, and county superintendents of schools in the development or acquisition, or both, of materials relating to wise use of resources and environmental issues.

(4) To assist districts in the development of educational curriculum and educational opportunities for students, relating to the conservation of resources, factors affecting ecological systems and the quality of man’s environment. Such opportunities may include but shall not be limited to, the development of outdoor education programs, nature centers, conservation and wildlife education camps, and participation in field trips.

(5) To establish and maintain a central library and repository for conservation education materials pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 8730) of this chapter.

(6) To review and to evaluate each application for a grant to, or a contract with, institutions of higher education, state and local education agencies, regional educational research organizations, and other public and private agencies, organizations and institutions (including libraries and museums) under the terms of the Federal Environmental Education Act (Public Law 91-516), to support research, demonstration, and pilot projects designed to educate the public on the problems of environmental quality and ecological balance, except that no grant can be made other than to a nonprofit agency, organization or institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8723.

The Conservation Education Service shall have such other powers and duties as shall be vested in it by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conservation Education Library [8730. - 8734.]

8730.

There is in the Department of Education a Central Library and Repository for conservation education materials. Such materials may be developed by private conservation groups, by industry, and by professional, scientific, and governmental sources.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8731.

The purpose of the library shall be to serve as a master source of materials for the Conservation Education Service, public school districts, county superintendents of schools, and any regional conservation education centers which may be established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.

The department shall, in establishing the library, explore new methods in data processing, new library procedures, and new means for distributing materials to local school districts, county superintendents of schools, and any regional conservation education centers which may be established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8733.

The library shall thoroughly evaluate new materials for validity, pertinence, objectivity, and usefulness, and shall advise the state board in the adoption of textbooks in regard to meeting the requirements for conservation education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8734.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, upon the recommendation of the Conservation Education Service, is authorized to make planning and implementation grants to individual school districts, or groups of school districts, unified school districts, county superintendents of schools, the University of California, the state universities and colleges, and the community colleges to assist such entities in the development of programs and curriculum in conservation education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Outdoor Science, Conservation, and Forestry [8760. - 8774.]

8760.

(a) The governing board of any school district may do the following:

(1) Conduct programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education within or without the boundaries of the district and for that purpose employ instructors, supervisors, and other personnel and provide necessary equipment and supplies.

(2) Acquire and maintain real or personal property needed for outdoor science education and conservation education programs and classes either within or without the boundaries of the district either by purchase, rental, lease, gift, or other means in the same manner as if the property were within the boundaries of the school district.

(3) Contract with the United States, the State of California, any city, county, city and county or school district therein, or any combination thereof, for the joint operation and maintenance of these programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education or for assistance in their operation and maintenance.

(4) Transport or arrange transportation of pupils, instructors, supervisors, or other personnel to or from places where these programs and classes are being conducted, whether within or without the district; provided, the transportation is within the state.

(b) The governing board of any school district may contract with an outside provider for the services of naturalists. The services provided by the naturalists shall be under the exclusive control and management of the governing board of the school district and shall comply with all guidelines established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction relating to outdoor educational programs. Any naturalist under contract with the governing board of a school district pursuant to this section and all services provided by a naturalist shall be under the supervision of a certificated employee of the school district. Any naturalist assigned to serve school districts under an outside contract shall be subject to Sections 45125 and 49406. No person who has been convicted of any sex offense defined in Section 44010, or any controlled substance offense defined in Section 44011, shall be permitted to render service as a naturalist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8761.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, whenever an outdoor science program involves studies in marine science, the governing board of any school district or a county superintendent of schools may transport, or arrange transportation of, pupils, instructors, supervisors, or other personnel aboard U.S. Coast Guard approved vessels in the waters of the Pacific Ocean for distances not to exceed five miles westerly of any offshore island which is a part of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

8762.

The governing board of any school district may:

(a) Conduct courses in forestry, and for that purpose employ instructors and supervisors of classes, and acquire necessary equipment.

(b) Acquire forest lands outside the boundary of the district by lease for a period not exceeding five years, or purchase or sell forest lands in the same manner as lands within the boundary of the district are purchased or sold.

(c) Afforest and reforest, and plant trees, shrubs, and vines on the lands; or upon any public lands which may be placed at its disposal, and enter into contracts and agreements with the government of the United States, the state, or any political subdivision thereof for that purpose.

(d) Transport pupils, instructors, or supervisors of classes to or from classes or places where the work is being done, whether within or without the district, in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as in transporting pupils to and from school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

8763.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, enter into agreements with the governing board of one or more school districts or private schools to provide programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education for pupils in the district or private school. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the agreement shall provide for the payment by the district or the private school of the actual cost of providing the programs or classes. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the district or the private school shall pay, as the case may be, to the county school service fund the amounts set forth in the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

8764.

The school district or districts entering into agreements pursuant to this article with the county superintendent of schools may agree to make capital outlay expenditures, as well as pay for the other costs of the program. Title to all property acquired by the capital outlay expenditures shall be vested in the office of the county superintendent of schools, and the participating school districts shall have no interest in the property, nor in the proceeds of any sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of the property, unless the parties otherwise provide in the agreement which authorizes the acquisition of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

8765.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the powers and duties authorized for governing boards of school districts by Section 8760 are powers and duties of the county superintendent of schools whenever, pursuant to this article, he or she provides programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

8766.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, acquire by gift and maintain real or personal property needed for such programs and classes with title thereto vested in the office of the county superintendent of schools. The school districts or community college districts or private schools participating in such programs and classes shall not be required to reimburse the county superintendent of schools for use of real and personal property which is acquired by gift.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

8767.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, provide the coordination services authorized by Section 1703 in connection with programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education and the participating districts or private schools shall not be required to reimburse the county superintendent for the cost of such coordination services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

8768.

Any such agreement between the county superintendent of schools and school districts or community college districts or private schools may provide for the purchase or lease of any real property necessary to conduct classes in outdoor science education and conservation education. If real property is purchased pursuant to such an agreement, title to such real property shall be vested in the office of the county superintendent of schools and the participating school districts, community college districts, or private schools shall have no interest in such property, nor in the proceeds of any sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of such property, unless the parties otherwise provide in the agreement which authorizes the acquisition of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

8769.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, lease real or personal property for the purpose of care, teaching, and training of physically handicapped children or children with intellectual disabilities if the property is not required for outdoor science education and conservation education, upon the terms and conditions that are agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 5.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

8770.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, convey any real property, title to which is vested in the office of the county superintendent of schools, to the United States of America in exchange for other real property of comparable value, upon such terms and conditions as are agreed upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8771.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of real or personal property, title to which is vested in his or her office, pursuant to the same procedures as are established by law for the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of real or personal property by a school district or community college district. Unless otherwise provided in the agreement which authorized the purchase of the real or personal property, the proceeds of any sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of real or personal property shall be vested in the office of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

8772.

All proceeds from the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of real or personal property received by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be used for the purpose of acquiring other real or personal property for use in connection with programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education or to pay the cost of conducting such programs and classes. The school districts, community college districts, and private schools participating in such programs and classes shall not be required to reimburse the county superintendent of schools for use of the real or personal property acquired with such funds nor shall they be required to reimburse the county superintendent of schools for any of the costs of conducting such programs and classes which are paid by the county superintendent of schools out of such funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

8773.

If during a period of five consecutive school years, no programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education are conducted by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to this article, all real and personal property, title to which is vested in the county superintendent of schools, and all proceeds from the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of such real and personal property, shall become part of the county school service fund and may be used for any purpose authorized by the laws applicable to the fund, unless the parties otherwise provide in the agreement which authorizes the acquisition of such property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8774.

(a) A residential outdoor science program shall be eligible for funding pursuant to this section if it meets both of the following conditions:

(1) It is operated by a school district or county office of education pursuant to this article.

(2) It meets the standards of the Residential Outdoor Science School (ROSS) Guide and maintains current department ROSS certification.

(b) An eligible residential outdoor science program may claim apportionment for any pupil who meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The pupil is enrolled in a California public school.

(2) The pupil is enrolled in grade 5 or 6.

(3) The applicant has not previously received funding for the pupil pursuant to this section.

(4) The pupil participates in a minimum four-day and three-night program.

(5) The pupil is economically disadvantaged and meets the criteria of Section 49552.

(c) The Superintendent shall, subject to appropriation of funds for this purpose, apportion to each school district or county office of education that operates a residential outdoor science program pursuant to this article an amount equal to ten dollars ($10) per eligible participating pupil, multiplied by the total number of days of participation, up to a maximum of five days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Healthy Start Support Services for Children Act [8800. - 8807.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [8800. - 8802.]

8800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Start Support Services for Children Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A large and growing number of California’s children are not learning enough in school to prepare them for full economic, social, and civic participation in adult life, as evidenced by the following statistics:

(1) Each year, between 59,000 and 72,000 children are born exposed to drugs or alcohol.

(2) Currently 360,000 children are abused or neglected, according to the juvenile courts and county welfare departments.

(3) Each year, a substantial number of parents have their parental rights terminated by the courts.

(4) Seventy thousand children are presently placed with foster care because of parental abuse or neglect or delinquent behavior.

(5) Out of an average class of 30 high school sophomores, any eight pupils are on public assistance, any four speak no English, any eight are at least two years behind in reading and math, any three have grown up in public housing, any seven will not graduate, any three will be teen parents, and any seven will not be employable.
